dev/verbs.dix
  <!-- ;  -->
    <pardef n="__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Daudzskaitlis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgām</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgās</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvām</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvās</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgām</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgās</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Sieviešu<b/>dzimte</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Vienskaitlis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīga</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgai</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgā</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīva</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvai</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvā</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīga</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgai</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vajadzīgā</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Daudzskaitlis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgi</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgiem</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgus</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atkarīgos</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvi</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīviem</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvus</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzīvos</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaides</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaižu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaidēm</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaidēs</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaisi</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaisu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaisiem</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaisus</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gaisos</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>galvas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>galvu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>galvām</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>galvās</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>priekšgali</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>priekšgalu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>priekšgaliem</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>priekšgalus</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>priekšgalos</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>priekšrokas</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>priekšroku</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n=""/></r>

    <e lm=""><i></i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
